Wyoming, session 2025, SF0135.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. When federal financial regulators
overreach or abuse their authority in the regulation of
Wyoming state chartered banks, the harm extends not only to
the bank, but the state of Wyoming itself. Wyoming has
developed innovative and rigorous banking laws which have
encouraged financial institutions to locate within the
state and increased revenue to the state. Federal overreach
decreases revenue to the Wyoming division of banking,
SF0135

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0693
decreases state revenue and drives out financial
institutions.

Section 2. W.S. 13-1-901 is created to read:

ARTICLE 9
DEFENSE OF STATE BANKING

13-1-901. Attorney general authorization to defend
the state's banking interests.

(a) The legislature finds and declares that:

(i) A dual banking system has existed in the
United States since the enactment of the federal National
Banking Act of 1863. The current regulatory structure
includes a state agency from each state that serves as the
chartering authority and primary regulator for state
banking licensees. The dual banking system has allowed
individual states to be responsive to the banking needs of
their citizens resulting in a variety of new products and
services over the years. The dual banking system has
mitigated the tendency of regulators to stifle innovation
SF0135

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0693
and restrict new entrants into the banking industry. Recent
events suggest this may no longer be the case;

(ii) In order for the dual banking system to
succeed, state and nationally chartered banks must be
fairly treated under the law, without undue regard to the
origin of a bank's charter, political inclinations or any
other concerns beyond the explicit scope of the law;

(iii) The state of Wyoming has an interest in
ensuring that its laws authorizing state chartered banks
are given due consideration by other states and the United
States, and that Wyoming chartered state banks are treated
fairly by regulatory authorities to the extent any
disparate treatment is caused by Wyoming's innovative but
lawful banking laws.

(b) The attorney general shall investigate any
allegation by a Wyoming state chartered bank of unlawful
disparate treatment by federal or other states' regulators.
The attorney general shall take any available action deemed
necessary to defend Wyoming's interest in the dual banking
system and its interest in assuring that similarly situated
SF0135

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0693
Wyoming state chartered banks are fairly treated by other
regulatory authorities in the same manner as a nationally
chartered or other state chartered bank.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0135